Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Chapter 13 Watercraft

Cross references. —

As to game and fish commission generally, see §§

23-1-201

through

23-1-303

.

As to game and fish department generally, see §§

23-1-401

through

23-1-405

.

As to provisions requiring boats for hire to have life preservers and as to life jackets for occupants of boats and rafts, see §§

35-10-403

through

35-10-406

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

12 Am. Jur. 2d Boats and Boating § 1 et seq.

Rights of boating or the like in inland lakes, 57 ALR2d 569.

Liability of owner or operator of motorboat for injury or damage, 63 ALR2d 343, 71 ALR3d 1018.

Liability of manufacturer or seller for injury caused by vehicle, aircraft, boat or their parts, supplies or equipment, 78 ALR2d 460.

Liability under unseaworthiness doctrine for failure to furnish individual safety equipment or to require its use, 91 ALR2d 1019.

Boat as “motor vehicle” within automobile guest statute, 98 ALR2d 543.

Liability of owner of powerboat for injury or death allegedly caused by one permitted to operate boat by owner, 71 ALR3d 1018.

Admiralty jurisdiction: maritime nature of tort — modern cases, 80 ALR Fed 105.